Wyoming statutes. Title 31 Motor Vehicles
Article 2. Registration

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

7A Am. Jur. 2d Automobiles and Highway Traffic §§ 31, 55 to 58.

Validity of regulations respecting type or condition of automobile used in transportation of passengers for hire, 7 ALR2d 1266.

Lack of automobile registration or operator's license as evidence of negligence, 29 ALR2d 963.

Owner's liability for injury by unregistered automobile while being used for servant's own pleasure or business, 51 ALR2d 8, 51 ALR2d 120, 52 ALR2d 350.

Civil rights and liabilities as affected by failure to comply with statute upon sale of motor vehicles, 58 ALR2d 1351.

Improper use of license plates as affecting liability for injuries, death, or damages in consequence of automobile accident, 99 ALR2d 904.

Plates: validity and construction of statute making it a criminal offense to “tamper” with motor vehicle or contents or to obscure registration plates, 57 ALR3d 606.

Farm vehicle: what constitutes farm vehicle, construction equipment, or vehicle temporarily on highway exempt from registration as motor vehicle, 27 ALR4th 843.

60 C.J.S. Motor Vehicles §§ 156 to 255.

§ 31-2-201.
Registration required; timelines.

Except as provided in W.S.

31-2-224

and subsection (q) of this section, every owner, or if applicable, operator or lessee, of a vehicle which will be operated or driven upon any highway in Wyoming, shall be required to obtain registration at the following times:

Annually not later than the last day of the annual registration month. Applications may be by mail;

Upon transfer of ownership of a vehicle:

Within sixty (60) days if transferred and temporary license permits issued by a licensed dealer;

Within sixty (60) days if transferred by an out-of-state dealer, regardless of when the out-of-state temporary permit expires;

Within sixty (60) days if transferred under the provisions of W.S. 31-2-104(h). Vehicles may be operated by the transferee during this sixty (60) day period when accompanied by a signed bill of sale that substantially conforms with the form provided in W.S. 31-2-104(h)(ii);

Within forty-five (45) days for other transfer. Vehicles may be operated by the transferee during this forty-five (45) day period when accompanied by a properly executed title for the vehicle transferring interest in the vehicle to the transferee.

Upon becoming a resident in the case of a previous nonresident owner;

Notwithstanding paragraph (iii) of this subsection, immediately when the vehicle is being operated by a person not from this state for transportation to or from, or for the purpose of gainful employment or any trade, profession or occupation within this state.

through (C) Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 16, § 4.

through (h) Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 16, § 4.

Any nonresident owner, lessee or operator of a vehicle that is not a commercial vehicle, who is employed in this state on a temporary or full-time basis may choose to purchase a temporary worker registration permit from the county treasurer in lieu of registering the vehicle pursuant to paragraph (a)(iv) of this section and paying the fees pursuant to W.S.

31-3-101

, provided the vehicle displays a valid registration and license plate from another jurisdiction and is properly insured. Application for the temporary worker registration permit shall be made to the county treasurer in the manner and form prescribed by the department and shall be submitted with proof of valid insurance. The temporary worker registration permit shall bear a distinctive number assigned to the vehicle, an expiration date and at all times be prominently displayed and clearly visible on the vehicle in a manner prescribed by the department. Fees collected under this subsection shall be deposited in the county general fund. The fee for a temporary worker registration permit shall be fifty dollars ($50.00) per each month of required registration, and shall not exceed one hundred twenty (120) days per vehicle.

W.S.

31-2-225

notwithstanding, upon compliance with W.S. 39-15-107(b) and 39-16-107(b), if applicable, an owner of a commercial vehicle that is not a Wyoming based commercial vehicle as defined by W.S. 31-18-201(a)(vi), a nonresident owner of a vehicle not employed in this state, or any owner upon transfer of ownership or lease, may, as an alternative to registration, obtain one (1) temporary registration permit in a twelve (12) month period authorizing operation of the vehicle on the highways of this state for a period not to exceed ninety (90) days from the date of issuance of the temporary registration permit. Any registration issued under this section shall bear a distinctive number assigned to the vehicle, an expiration date and at all times be prominently displayed and clearly visible on the vehicle in the manner prescribed by the department. Application for a temporary registration permit shall be made to the county treasurer in the manner and form prescribed by the department. A temporary registration permit under this subsection shall be considered an initial registration under W.S. 31-1-101(a)(xxx). The fee for the temporary registration permit shall be an amount equal to the following fractions of the annual registration fees for the vehicle required under W.S.

31-3-101

:

Up to thirty (30) days at one-tenth (.10);

Up to sixty (60) days at two-tenths (.20);

Up to ninety (90) days at three-tenths (.30).

A one time “in transit” permit may also be purchased for a fee of twenty dollars ($20.00) per vehicle, which entitles a person who obtains a vehicle from any person, other than a licensed Wyoming vehicle dealer, to operate the vehicle on the highways of Wyoming without registration, only for the purpose of removing the vehicle from the state within a period of forty-eight (48) hours from the date of the permit. The applicant for this permit shall be required to provide any documentation necessary, including proof of insurance, to satisfy the county treasurer that the applicant has the lawful right to the vehicle. The permit shall expire forty-eight (48) hours after issuance, or upon leaving the state. The permit shall bear a distinctive number assigned to the vehicle, an expiration date and shall at all times be prominently displayed and clearly visible on the vehicle in a manner prescribed by the department.

A vehicle which is not included as part of a licensed dealer’s inventory, is not currently registered in this state or any other jurisdiction and is required to be registered if operated on the public highways of this state may be operated for demonstration purposes, without a load, on the public highways of this state while displaying a demonstration permit. The permit shall be obtained from the department, agent or any authorized person by the department, upon application, presentation of a valid certificate of title and payment of the prescribed fee. The permit shall indicate the dates of demonstration, not exceeding ninety-six (96) hours, and such other information as the department prescribes. The department shall prescribe the manner in which the permit shall be displayed.

A resident found to be in control of a vehicle operated or driven upon any highway for which Wyoming vehicle registration is required shall be rebuttably presumed to be the actual owner of the vehicle, subject to the following:

The department, in consultation with the department of revenue, a county treasurer or a Wyoming peace officer, is authorized to determine that a resident is in control of a vehicle operated or driven upon any highway in Wyoming for which Wyoming vehicle registration is required. Factors that indicate a resident is in control of a vehicle include, but are not limited to the following:

The resident was a purchaser of the vehicle;

The resident operated or stored the vehicle in Wyoming for any period of time;

The resident is a partner, member or shareholder of the business entity that purports to be the owner of the vehicle;

The resident is insured to drive the vehicle.

Upon a determination that a resident is in control of a vehicle operated or driven upon any highway in Wyoming for which Wyoming vehicle registration is required, the department shall notify the resident in writing that the resident is required to register the vehicle and to pay any sales or use taxes due on the purchase or use of the vehicle in accordance with W.S. 39-15-107(b)(i) or 39-16-107(b)(ii) within thirty (30) days from the date of the notice;

The department shall promulgate rules necessary to implement this subsection, including rules to provide the resident an opportunity for a hearing and appeal in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. Following a final determination in the appeal in favor of the department, the resident shall owe the taxes and fees determined to be due.

If a resident found to be in control of a vehicle operated or driven upon any highway for which Wyoming vehicle registration is required under subsection (o) of this section fails to pay registration fees or applicable sales or use taxes due within thirty (30) days from the date of the notice required under subsection (o) of this section or within thirty (30) days following a final determination in favor of the department, the person shall be charged a penalty equal to seventy-five percent (75%) of the unpaid registration fees.

Members of the armed forces who register their vehicles in Wyoming, are deployed outside the continental United States for ninety (90) days or more and whose vehicle registrations expire during their term of deployment shall be permitted to register their vehicles no later than fourteen (14) days after returning to Wyoming after deployment. The annual registration month of a vehicle registered under this subsection shall be the month in which the vehicle is registered after deployment. No fees or penalties shall be charged as a result of registration under this subsection and the registration fees charged shall be the same as otherwise provided in this article. Members who register under this subsection shall:

Provide to the county treasurer proper documentation of the deployment; and

Attest that the vehicle to be registered was not driven between the date the vehicle registration expired and the date of registration under this subsection.

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 47, § 3; 1985, ch. 96, § 1; 1986, ch. 26, § 1; ch. 88, § 2; 1987, ch. 72, § 1; ch. 90, § 1; ch. 121, § 1; 1991, ch. 256, § 2; 1993, ch. 68, § 5; 1994, ch. 90, § 2; 1996, ch. 45, § 1; 1997, ch. 154, § 2; 1999, ch. 35, § 1; ch. 37, § 1; 2000, ch. 75, § 2; 2003, ch. 33, § 1; ch. 205, § 1; 2008, ch. 54, § 1; 2009, ch. 16, §§ 2, 4; ch. 128, § 2; 2015 ch. 31, § 1, effective January 1, 2016; 2017 ch. 148, § 1, effective July 1, 2018; 2018 ch. 61, § 1, effective July 1, 2018; 2019 ch. 194, § 1, effective January 1, 2020.

Cross references. —

As to registration of off-road recreational vehicles used on off-road recreational vehicle trails, see article 7 of this chapter.

As to refusal, suspension or revocation of registration of motor-driven cycle with noncomplying brakes, see §

31-5-951

.

The 2003 amendment,

effective January 1, 2004, added the exception in (a)(iv)(A) pertaining to the decal for temporary workers.

The 2008 amendment,

effective January 1, 2009, deleted “between January 1 through March 31 for vehicles registered under W.S.

31-18-201

, and for all others annually” following “Annually” in (a)(i).

The 2009 amendment,

effective January 1, 2010, rewrote the introductory language of (a), which read: “Every owner of a vehicle shall apply for registration of and license plates for the vehicle at the following times”; added “regardless of when the out-of-state temporary permit expires, regardless of when the out-of-state temporary permit expires” in (a)(ii)(B); rewrote (a)(iv), which read: “Notwithstanding paragraph (iii) of this subsection, immediately if the operator of a vehicle operated in this state is”; repealed former (a)(iv)(A) through (a)(iv)(C) which provided for requirements for purchase of a decal from the county treasurer in lieu of registering a vehicle; repealed former (b) through (h) pertaining to weight certificate, exemptions, and fees; and added (j) through (n).

The 2015 amendment,

effective January 1, 2016, substituted “sixty (60) days” for “forty-five (45) days” in (a)(ii)(A) through (a)(ii)(C); and substituted “forty-five (45) days” for “thirty (30) days” in (a)(ii)(D).

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, added (o) and (p).

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (a), inserted “and subsection (q) of this section”; and added (q).

The 2019 amendment,

effective January 1, 2020, in (a)(ii)(C), substituted “a signed bill of sale that substantially conforms with the form provided in W.S. 31-2-104(h)(ii)” for “a notarized bill of sale.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Registration of off-road vehicles. —

Laws 1986, ch. 88, § 3, provides that no off-road recreational vehicle as defined in § 31-1-101(a)(xv)(K) shall be registered by a county treasurer after March 31, 1986.

County registration fee is actually a “tax” rather than a “fee.”

It is collected annually, is measured by the value of the vehicle and is designed to raise revenue rather than merely cover the costs of administration of motor vehicle registration. United States v. Wyoming, 402 F. Supp. 229, 1975 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 15847 (D. Wyo. 1975).

Federal law does not exempt nonresident servicemen from state registration fee.

United States v. Wyoming, 402 F. Supp. 229, 1975 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 15847 (D. Wyo. 1975).

But nonresident servicemen exempt from county registration fees. —

Section 514 of the federal Soldiers' and Sailors' Civil Relief Act of 1940, 50 App. USCS § 574, exempted nonresident servicemen seeking to register their automobiles in Wyoming from payment of county registration fees. United States v. Wyoming, 402 F. Supp. 229, 1975 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 15847 (D. Wyo. 1975).

Improperly displayed out-of-state license plates justifies stop. —

A patrolman had a reason to suspect that the driver of car with Colorado license plate not displayed in accordance with Colorado law was violating Wyoming law, and he had authority to stop the car. Vargas-Rocha v. State, 891 P.2d 763,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 1995).

Cited in

Clay v. State, 2016 WY 55, 372 P.3d 195,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 59

(Wyo. 2016).

Applicability. —

Laws 2019, ch. 194 § 2, provides: "This act applies to certificates of title and bills of sale issued on or after January 1, 2020."

Law reviews. —

For article, “Automobiles — Chattel Mortgages — Recording,” see
3 Wyo. L.J. 92.

For article, “The Record System, Perfection of a Security Interest and Subsequent Purchasers or Creditors,” see 18 Wyo. L.J. 269 (1964).

§ 31-2-202.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as §

31-18-201

by Laws 1993, ch. 68, § 3.

Cross references. —

For present provisions concerning registration of commercial vehicles, see §

31-18-201

.

§ 31-2-203.
Reciprocal agreements and exemptions.

The department may negotiate reciprocal agreements with appropriate officials of any other jurisdiction, in which nonresidents of this state shall be exempt from Wyoming vehicle registration fees in exchange for equivalent exemptions from like fees imposed by the other jurisdictions on residents of this state.

The department shall determine from time to time and advise each Wyoming motor vehicle registration and fee collecting official or other person and each state agency charged with enforcing motor vehicle statutes of Wyoming of the name of each state contiguous to Wyoming which has granted or subsequently grants for the benefit of affected Wyoming motor vehicle owners reciprocal exemptions pursuant to W.S.

31-18-201

and subsection (a) of this section, together with the nature and extent of each reciprocal grant by the other state, and shall likewise advise of the name of each jurisdiction with which the department has entered into a reciprocal agreement together with the nature and extent of the reciprocal grants made.

Repealed by Laws 1989, ch. 129, § 3.

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 47, § 3; 1987, ch. 37, § 1; 1989, ch. 129, § 3; 1991, ch. 241, § 3.

§ 31-2-204.
Issuance of certificates of registration and license plates by county; form.

Upon receipt of an approved application and payment of fees the county treasurer shall issue to the applicant a certificate of registration conforming with the facts set forth in the application together with one (1) license plate or validation sticker for motorcycles, multipurpose vehicles, trailers, including house trailers, and vehicles operated with dealer license plates and two (2) license plates or proper validation stickers for any other vehicle. A copy of the certificate of registration shall be carried at all times in the motor vehicle for which it is valid and shall be displayed upon demand of any peace officer.

Except as otherwise provided, license plates shall be of metal not less than twelve (12) inches long in the left-hand end of which shall be arabic numerals for the county in which issued, followed by the bucking horse and rider emblem and a distinctive number assigned to the vehicle, set forth in numerals and letters as determined by the department and above or underneath such numerals shall be the word “Wyoming” and arabic numerals for the year of issue or validation. License plates issued to dealers and for state or federal official forestry vehicles, motorcycles, multipurpose vehicles and trailers shall contain appropriate identification which may be in lieu of the bucking horse and rider emblem. After the county number on the left-hand end, the license plate may also contain a distinctive symbol or letters, as determined by the department, indicating vehicle type. License plates shall be changed or validated annually. There shall be a marked contrast between the color of the plate and that of the numerals and letters and the background of all plates shall be fully reflectorized. Plates for light utility trailers under one thousand (1,000) pounds, motorcycles and multipurpose vehicles shall not be less than three (3) inches wide and six (6) inches long. Antique license plates shall bear no date and shall bear the inscription “Pioneer Wyo”. Distinctive license farm stickers shall be issued by the county treasurer upon request for trucks and trailers used by any farmer or rancher for the transportation of livestock, feed or unprocessed agricultural products owned and produced by the farmer or rancher from the place of production to market and of ranch supplies intended solely for the use of the farmer or rancher, and not for sale, on the return trip, and not for the transportation of goods and persons for hire. Farm stickers shall bear the inscription “Farm”.

The distinctive license plate numbers shall begin with one (1) and be numbered consecutively in each county. In ordering license plates the department may from year to year change the location of the figures, words and letters or validation sticker as deemed necessary.

For the purposes of this section, the several counties of the state shall be numbered as follows: Albany-5, Big Horn-9, Campbell-17, Carbon-6, Converse-13, Crook-18, Fremont-10, Goshen-7, Hot Springs-15, Johnson-16, Laramie-2, Lincoln-12, Natrona-1, Niobrara-14, Park-11, Platte-8, Sheridan-3, Sublette-23, Sweetwater-4, Teton-22, Uinta-19, Washakie-20, Weston-21, and new counties shall be assigned numbers by the department as they may be formed, beginning with the number 24.

For the purposes of this chapter, provisions for license plates for motorcycles shall apply to autocycles.

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 47, § 3; 1991, ch. 241, § 3; 2001, ch. 183, § 1; 2003, ch. 55, § 1; 2007, ch. 34, § 1; 2009, ch. 16, § 2; 2014 ch. 112, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2015 ch. 69, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2017 ch. 48, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2017 ch. 165, § 1, effective March 6, 2017.

The 2007 amendment,

effective January 1, 2008, inserted “multipurpose vehicles” in (a); in (b), inserted “state or federal official forestry vehicles, motorcycles, multipurpose vehicles and,” and substituted “Plates for light utility trailers under one thousand (1,000) pounds, motorcycles and multipurpose vehicles” for “Motorcycle plates.”

The 2009 amendment,

effective January 1, 2010, added the last sentence in (a).

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, in (b), added “After the county number on the left-hand end, the license plate may also contain a distinctive symbol or letters, as determined by the department, indicating vehicle type.”

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in the middle of (b), substituted “Distinctive license farm stickers shall be issued by the county treasurer upon request for trucks and trailers” for “license stickers for trucks and trailers”, and made a related change.

The 2017 amendments. —

The first
2017 amendment, by ch. 48, § 1, effective July 1, 2017, at the end of (b), deleted the last six sentences."

The second
2017 amendment, by ch. 165, § 1, added (e).

Laws 2017, ch. 165, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 6, 2017.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

§ 31-2-205.
Display of license plates.

License plates for vehicles shall be:

Conspicuously displayed and securely fastened to be plainly visible:

One (1) on the front of the vehicle, excluding the following:

Motorcycles;

Multipurpose vehicles;

Trailers, including house trailers;

Vehicles operated with demo, full use or manufacturer license plates issued pursuant to W.S.

31-16-125

;

Street rods registered pursuant to W.S.

31-2-226

;

Custom vehicles registered pursuant to W.S.

31-2-227

;

Antique vehicles registered pursuant to W.S.

31-2-223

;

A motor vehicle which was originally manufactured without a bracket, device or other means to display and secure a front license plate;

Off-road recreational vehicles as defined by W.S. 31-1-101(a)(xv)(K)(II) that are registered pursuant to W.S.

31-2-232

.

One (1) on the rear of the vehicle.

Secured to prevent swinging;

Attached in a horizontal position no less than twelve (12) inches from the ground;

Maintained free from foreign materials and in a condition to be clearly legible.

Repealed by Laws 1991, ch. 37, § 1.

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 47, § 3; 1987, ch. 155, § 1; 1989, ch. 7, § 2; 1991, ch. 37, § 2; 1997, ch. 154, § 2; 2007, ch. 34, § 1; 2009, ch. 46, § 2; 2015 ch. 34, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2021 ch. 34, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2007 amendment,

effective January 1, 2008, amends this section by inserting “multipurpose vehicles” in (a)(i)(A).

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, added “street rods registered pursuant to W.S.

31-2-226

and custom vehicles registered pursuant to W.S.

31-2-227

, provided that such custom vehicles were manufactured prior to 1968 or were originally manufactured to have one (1) license plate” in (a)(i)(A) and made related changes.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, added designations (a)(i)(A)(I) through (a)(i)(A)(VI); deleted the former proviso at the end of (a)(i)(A); added (a)(i)(A)(VII) and (a)(i)(A)(VIII); and made related and stylistic changes.

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, added (a)(i)(A)(IX).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2017, ch. 48, § 3, provides: "A veteran license sticker displayed on a license plate that is manufactured by the department of transportation and sold by the veterans' affairs commission before July 1, 2017 shall not be considered foreign material for purposes of
W.S. 31-2-205(a)(iv)."

Investigatory stop.—

Record supported
the district's court's conclusion that a police officer had a particularized
and objective basis for suspecting that defendant was in violation
of a Wyoming law requiring license plates or a valid registration
to be displayed and plainly visible on a vehicle, and that the officer
could properly stop the vehicle to investigate further. Thus, the
investigatory stop of defendant's vehicle was justified by reasonable
suspicion. Clay v. State, 2016 WY 55, 372 P.3d 195,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 59

(Wyo. 2016).

Interpretation. —

Requirements of this section that a license plate be “plainly visible” is not connected to any class of “obscuring matter,” and the doctrine of ejusdem generis is not applicable.
Parks v. State, 2011 WY 19, 247 P.3d 857,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 2011).

Obstructed plate is a violation of this section. —

Trailer ball mounted in a place that causes it to partially obstruct a license plate from view is a violation of this section.
Parks v. State, 2011 WY 19, 247 P.3d 857,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 2011).

Obstruction of plate is forbidden. —

Requirements of this section that a license plate be “plainly visible” and “clearly legible” indicate that a license plate must not be obstructed in any manner.
Parks v. State, 2011 WY 19, 247 P.3d 857,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 2011).

Cited

in

State v. Williams, 2004 WY 53, 90 P.3d 85,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 64

(2004).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity and construction of statute making it a criminal offense to obscure registration plates, 57 ALR3d 606.

§ 31-2-206.
Annual renewal; delivery of license plates and stickers; staggered registration.

Except as otherwise provided vehicle registrations expire on the last day of the annual registration month. Renewals are effective for one (1) year beginning the first day of the month following the annual registration month. The initial registration for a vehicle in this state expires on the last day of the annual registration month in the following year. Except as provided in subsection (h) of this section, nothing in this section prohibits an owner from registering a vehicle for more than twelve (12) but less than twenty-four (24) months.

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 16, § 4.

License plates or stickers may be delivered by mail if the applicant so desires. The cost of mailing license plates or stickers may be required to be paid by the applicant.

Unless reassigned to a like vehicle of the same owner in the manner and form prescribed by the department, license plates or stickers issued during any calendar year shall only be used on the vehicle for which issued through the last day of the annual registration month for the vehicle in the succeeding calendar year.

and (f) Repealed by Laws 2017, ch. 41, § 2.

Any person who registers two (2) or more vehicles may select one (1) currently existing annual registration month for all of those vehicles. Notwithstanding W.S. 31-1-101(a)(xxx)(B), any person who elects to register vehicles under the provisions of this subsection may thereafter apply to the county treasurer to have the same annual registration month apply to subsequently acquired vehicles. When electing to establish the same registration period for all vehicles, the owner shall pay the current annual registration fee plus one-twelfth (1/12) of that annual fee for each additional month necessary to extend the registration to the registration period under which all the vehicles will be registered. No depreciation shall be allowed for the required additional months. Thereafter, all the vehicles shall be registered on an annual basis.

If a county treasurer with the approval of the board of county commissioners elects to register vehicles under this subsection, the annual registration month for all vehicles shall be December and except for vehicles registered during calendar year 1992 and each year thereafter, the license plates or stickers issued for any calendar year under this subsection shall only be used for the vehicle for which issued through the last day of March of the succeeding calendar year. For vehicles registered during calendar year 1992 and each year thereafter, the license plates or stickers issued for any calendar year under this subsection shall only be issued for use through the last day of February of the succeeding calendar year. W.S. 31-1-101(a)(xxx)(A) and (B) do not apply if an election is made under this subsection. A county treasurer with the approval of the board of county commissioners may subsequently elect to follow the procedure in subsection (g) of this section for any succeeding calendar year by notifying the department not later than April 1 of the year preceding the year for which the election is made and providing adequate publicity to county residents about the election. If any election is made to follow the procedure in subsection (g) of this section, credit shall be given for registration fees paid through December 31 of the year for which the election is made. If a county treasurer follows the procedure under subsection (g) of this section, no subsequent election shall be made. No election under this subsection shall be made for a calendar year in which new license plates shall be issued.

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 16, § 4.

Dealer demo, full use and manufacturer license plates are valid for one (1) year beginning the first day of the month following the annual registration month provided the dealer or manufacturer holds a valid license pursuant to W.S.

31-16-104

and the dealer or manufacturer license is not suspended, revoked, cancelled or expired. The dealer or manufacturer license plates shall expire upon the date of any revocation, suspension, cancellation or expiration of the dealer or manufacturer license. Any and all license plates expired pursuant to this paragraph shall be immediately returned to the department upon expiration.

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 16, § 4.

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 47, § 3; 1987, ch. 90, § 1; 1988, ch. 80, § 1; 1991, ch. 163, § 1; ch. 224, § 1; ch. 255, § 1; 1992, ch. 14, § 1; 1993, ch. 48, § 1; 1996, ch. 52, § 1; 1997, ch. 154, § 2; 1998, ch. 5, § 2; 2007, ch. 32, § 1; 2008, ch. 54, § 1; 2009, ch. 16, §§ 2, 4; 2017 ch. 41, § 2, effective July 1, 2017; 2018 ch. 108, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (d), substituted “Unless reassigned to a like vehicle of the same owner in the manner and form prescribed by the department” for “Except as otherwise provided.”

The 2008 amendment,

effective January 1, 2009, deleted “except that registration for commercial vehicles registered under W.S.

31-18-201

shall expire on March 31 of the succeeding calendar year” at the end of the third sentence in (a).

The 2009 amendment,

effective January 1, 2010, repealed former (b) which pertained to applications for a specific license plate; in (g), deleted “Notwithstanding subsection (e) of this section” at the beginning, and substituted “W.S. 31-1-101(a)(xxx)(B)” for “paragraph (j)(ii) of this section”; substituted “W.S. 31-1-101(a)(xxx)(A) and (B)” for “Paragraphs (j)(i) and (ii) of this section” at the beginning of the third sentence of (h); repealed former (j) which defined “annual registration month”; added the proviso and the second and third sentence in (k); and repealed former (m) pertaining to temporary registration as an alternate for nonresident and other vehicle owners.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, deleted former (e) and (f).

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (h), substituted “in subsection g” for “in subsections (e) through subsection (g)” preceding “of this section” in three places.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Election to register vehicles in county. —

Laws 1987, ch. 90, § 3, provides: “A county treasurer with the approval of the board of county commissioners may elect to register vehicles in his county under W.S. 31-2-206(h) as it appears in section 1 of this act in lieu of the procedure specified under W.S. 31-2-206(e) through (g) for the 1989 and succeeding registration years, shall notify the department not later than April 1, 1988, of that election and shall provide adequate publicity to county residents about the election.”

§ 31-2-207.
Publicly owned vehicles.

Upon application the department shall issue distinctive license plates indicating public ownership for vehicles owned by the United States, state of Wyoming, a county, city, town or political subdivision of Wyoming or a joint powers board under W.S.

16-1-101

through

16-1-109

. A distinctive license plate under this section may be issued to any public entity specified in this section, provided that the public entity or another public entity specified in this section owns the vehicle and the public entity applying for the distinctive license plate has the authority to possess and operate the vehicle in fulfillment of its public purpose. Upon presentation of proper credentials and identification of the applicant the department shall issue license plates not disclosing public ownership of a vehicle to investigative agencies of Wyoming and the criminal investigative agencies of the department of justice, department of defense and department of the treasury of the United States and the records of the department shall not disclose the public ownership of the vehicles.

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 47, § 3; 1999, ch. 47, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to division of criminal investigation, see §

9-1-611

.

Irrigation district does not come within purview of this section,

so as to enable it to claim exemption from paying license fee on motor vehicles owned by the district. State ex rel. Goshen Irrigation Dist. v. Hunt, 49 Wyo. 497, 57 P.2d 793,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 58

(Wyo. 1936) (applying rule of strict construction).

§ 31-2-208.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as §

31-2-221

by Laws 2009, ch. 16, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to fees for prestige license plates, see § 31-3-102(a)(viii).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2009, ch. 16, § 3, effective January 1, 2010, amended and renumbered this section as §

31-2-221

.

§ 31-2-209.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as §

31-2-222

by Laws 2009, ch. 16, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to fees for radio amateur license plates, see § 31-3-102(a)(xiv).

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2009, ch. 16 § 3, effective January 1, 2010, amended and renumbered this section as §

31-2-222

.

§ 31-2-210.
[Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as §

31-2-223

by Laws 2009, ch. 16, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to fees for antique motor vehicles, see §

31-2-223

.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2009, ch. 16, § 3, effective January 1, 2010, amended and renumbered this section as §

31-2-223

.

§ 31-2-211.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as §

31-18-404

by Laws 1993, ch. 68, § 4.

Cross references. —

For present provisions concerning the use of dealer plates and temporary permits, see §

31-18-404

.

§ 31-2-212.
Loss, mutilation or destruction of registration, plates or validation stickers.

Upon loss, mutilation or destruction of a certificate of registration, license plate, or validation sticker the owner of a vehicle may obtain a duplicate certificate of registration, new license plates or validation stickers from any county treasurer or the department if the vehicle was registered or plates or stickers were issued by the department upon application showing the loss, mutilation or destruction, return of mutilated plates or stickers and payment of the duplicate registration, plate or sticker fee. For those vehicles registered under the provisions of W.S. 31-2-213(h),

31-2-215

through

31-2-223

,

31-2-226

,

31-2-227

or

31-2-229

through

31-2-231

replacement duplicate license plates may be obtained upon application with the county treasurer from which the original plates were purchased or the department if applicable, accompanied by fees as provided by W.S. 31-3-102(a)(vi)(C). Duplicate license plates obtained under this section to replace lost or stolen plates shall not be displayed on the vehicle until the validation stickers on the lost or stolen plates have expired. Upon loss, mutilation or destruction of a dealer plate or validation sticker the dealer may obtain a replacement dealer plate or validation sticker from the county treasurer from which he purchased the original plate in the same manner as the owner of a vehicle and upon payment of the appropriate fee under W.S. 31-3-102(a)(vi). Obtaining a replacement plate is not the purchase of an additional plate under W.S. 31-16-125(b)(i). Upon application for new license plates or stickers the county treasurer shall notify the department and the county sheriff as soon as possible of the loss, mutilation or destruction. The department shall notify the appropriate law enforcement agencies of any loss, mutilation or destruction of license plates or stickers.

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 47, § 3; 1985, ch. 67, § 1; 1995, ch. 127, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1; 2009, ch. 16, § 2; 2021 ch. 64, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2004 amendment,

substituted “W.S. 31-16-125(b)(i)” for “W.S. 31-2-301(f).”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

The 2009 amendment,

effective January 1, 2010, in the first sentence, substituted “31-2-213(h) or

31-2-215

through

31-2-223

” for “31-2-206(b),

31-2-207

through

31-2-209

, 31-2-213(h) or

31-2-215

through

31-2-217

” and “31-3-102(a)(vi)(C)” for “31-3-102(a)(vi)(A)” at the end.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, in the second sentence, added "31-2-226,

31-2-227

or

31-2-229

through

31-2-231

" and made a related change.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”